Utah statutes.
31A-4-113.5.   Filing requirements -- National Association of Insurance
Commissioners.
(1) (a)  Each domestic, foreign, and alien insurer who is authorized to
transact insurance business in this state shall annually, on or before March
1, file with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners a copy of the
insurer's:
(i)  annual statement convention blank; and
(ii)   any additional filings required by the commissioner for the preceding
year.
(b)  The information filed with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners under Subsection (1)(a) shall:
(i)  be in the format and scope required by the commissioner; and
(ii)  include:
(A)  the signed jurat page; and
(B)  the actuarial certification.
(c)  Any amendments and addendums to an annual statement that are filed with
the commissioner shall be filed by the insurer with the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners.
(d)  At the time an insurer makes a filing under this Subsection (1), the
insurer shall pay any filing fees assessed by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners.
(e)  A foreign insurer that is domiciled in a state that has a law
substantially similar to this section shall be considered to be in compliance
with this section.
(2)  All financial analysis ratios and examination synopses concerning
insurance companies that are submitted to the department by the Insurance
Regulatory Information System are confidential and may not be disclosed by the
department.
(3)  The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the certificate
of authority of any insurer failing to:
(a)  file the annual statement as required by Subsection (1)(a) when due or
within any extension of time granted for good cause by:
(i)  the commissioner; or
(ii)  the National Association of Insurance Commissioners; or
(b)  pay by the time specified in Subsection (3)(a) a fee the insurer is
required to pay under this section to:
(i)  the commissioner; or
(ii)  the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
